Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1080.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.48 RCW to read as follows:(1) All fees or charges required to stay at a hotel must be disclosed in the advertised, displayed, or offered room rate, except for taxes and fees imposed by a government and assessment fees of a government-created special district or program.(2) Before the consumer reserves a stay at a hotel, all taxes and fees imposed by a government and assessment fees of a government-created special district or program must be included in the total price to be paid.(3) This section applies to any advertising, display, or offer that is before the public in this state, or from this state before the public in any state.(4)(a) A person that knew or should have known that he or she has advertised, displayed, or offered a room rate in violation of this section is subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $10,000 for each violation.(b) An action to enforce this section may be brought by a city attorney, county prosecuting attorney, or the attorney general.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 64.37 RCW to read as follows:(1) All fees or charges required to stay at a short-term rental must be disclosed in the advertised, displayed, or offered rate, except for taxes and fees imposed by a government and assessment fees of a government-created special district or program.(2) Before a guest reserves a stay at a short-term rental, all taxes and fees imposed by a government and assessment fees of a government-created special district or program must be included in the total price to be paid.(3) This section applies to any advertising, display, or offer that is before the public in this state, or from this state before the public in any state.(4)(a) A person that knew or should have known that he or she has advertised, displayed, or offered a room rate in violation of this section is subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $10,000 for each violation.(b) An action to enforce this section may be brought by a city attorney, county prosecuting attorney, or the attorney general.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2025.--- END ---